Hawaii statutes.
§88-202 Restrictions as to personnel.
This part shall not apply to any person who is in the service or employment of
the State or any county on or after July 1, 1953, but shall apply to per
diem workers and former per diem workers who joined the employees' retirement
system prior to January 1, 1952. [L 1945, c 264, §3; am L 1947, c 153, §1;
am L 1949, c 161, §1; am L 1951, c 65, §1; am L 1955, c 38, §1; RL 1955,
§6-181; HRS §88-202]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next